South Dakota, session 2026, HB1034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-3A-5.2 be AMENDED:
32-3A-5.2. In addition to the registration fee required under § 32-3A-5, the
department or county treasurer shall charge the owner two dollars and fifty cents per
decal or set of decals if a decal is sent to the owner through the mail. If the applicant
requests that a decal be express mailed, the applicant shall pay the actual cost of postage
and handling. The county treasurer shall deposit any fees for mailing or expressing decals
in the county general fund.
Section 2. That § 32-5-127 be AMENDED:
32-5-127. In addition to the registration fees required by this chapter, the
department or county treasurer shall charge the owner, when sent to the owner through
the mail:
(1) Two dollars and fifty cents per decal or set of decals; and
(2) Twelve dollars per license plate or set of plates.
Section 3. That § 32-6B-21.1 be AMENDED:
32-6B-21.1. In addition to the license plate and decal fees assessed in §§ 32-6B-
21, 32-6B-22.1, 32-6B-23, and 32-6B-36.3, the department shall charge the dealer, when
sent to the owner through the mail:
(1) Two dollars and fifty cents per decal or set of decals; and
(2) Twelve dollars per license plate or set of plates.
If the dealer requests that the decal or plate be express mailed, the dealer must
pay the actual costs of postage and handling.

26.212.18 2 1034
Section 4. That § 32-6C-7.1 be AMENDED:
32-6C-7.1. In addition to the license fees assessed in § 32-6C-7, the department
shall charge the dealer two dollars and fifty cents per decal if a decal is sent to the dealer
through the mail. If the dealer requests that the decal be express mailed, the dealer must
pay the actual costs of postage and handling.
Section 5. That § 32-7A-10.1 be AMENDED:
32-7A-10.1. In addition to the license fees assessed in § 32-7A-10, the
department shall charge the dealer, when sent to the owner through the mail:
(1) Two dollars and fifty cents per decal; and
(2) Twelve dollars per license plate.
If the dealer requests that the decal or plate be express mailed, the dealer must
pay the actual costs of postage and handling.
Section 6. That § 32-7B-10.1 be AMENDED:
32-7B-10.1. In addition to the license fees assessed in § 32-7B-10, the
department shall charge the dealer two dollars and fifty cents per decal if a decal is sent
to the dealer through the mail. If the dealer requests that the decal be express mailed,
the dealer must pay the actual costs of postage and handling.
Section 7. That § 32-9-3.1 be AMENDED:
32-9-3.1. Any motor vehicle or trailer owned and operated by a resident or a
nonresident engaged in the harvest of agricultural products may be operated upon the
highways, roads, and streets of this state upon payment of a seventy-five dollar fee.
Payment of the fee is evidenced by a permit provided by the department affixed in a
conspicuous place on the vehicle as the department may require.
Each permit, which is valid for a calendar year, must be purchased from the county
treasurer of any county through which the owner or operator may travel, or from an agent,
patrol officer, motor carrier enforcement officer, or motor carrier inspector of the
Department of Public Safety. If the applicant requests that the permit be mailed, the
applicant must pay two dollars and fifty cents per permit sent to the owner through the
mail. All fees collected shall be handled, accounted for, and distributed in the same manner
as the other fees provided for in this chapter. A violation of this section is a Class 2
misdemeanor.
HB1034 ENROLLED

26.212.18 3 1034
Section 8. That § 32-9-7 be AMENDED:
32-9-7. On receipt of an application under § 32-9-6 and payment of the
commercial motor vehicle fee, required by this chapter, and upon satisfactory evidence
that the applicant has complied with all laws, rules, and regulations of this state covering
motor vehicles and motor carriers, the county treasurer or department shall issue to the
applicant a receipt that identifies the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer and shall assign
a number to the vehicle. The number shall be endorsed upon the application and receipt.
The county treasurer or department shall issue to the applicant a commercial motor
vehicle certificate bearing the number. The certificate shall be placed and carried in the
vehicle in a conspicuous place and is subject to examination upon demand by any officer
of this state, county, or municipality. The county treasurer or department shall issue to
the applicant two commercial motor vehicle plates for each motor vehicle. Each county
treasurer office shall be stocked with commercial license plates issued pursuant to this
section and commercial trailer license plates issued pursuant to § 32-9-8.1.
If the plates are mailed, the applicant must pay twelve dollars per license plate or
set of plates if the plate is sent to the owner through the mail, or two dollars and fifty
cents per decal or set of decals if the decal is sent to the owner through the mail. If the
applicant requests that the plate or decal be express mailed, the applicant must pay any
costs for the express mailing service.
Each plate must set forth the amount of gross weight in figures, and be in colors
and designs for each classification specified in § 32-9-15. Each plate must be securely
fastened to the front and rear end of each commercial motor vehicle in a conspicuous
place.
The county treasurer shall deposit in the county general fund any fees received for
mailing or expressing a plate or sticker. The department shall deposit all fees received for
mailing or expressing the plates or stickers in the state motor vehicle fund. A violation of
this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Section 9. That § 32-10-17 be AMENDED:
32-10-17. The administrator shall register the vehicles described and identified in
an application pursuant to § 32-10-15 and shall issue a license plate or plates, or a vehicle
registration card, or other suitable identification device, for each vehicle described in the
application upon payment of the fees for registration and licensing and for the vehicle
registration cards or other identification devices. A fee of three dollars must be paid for
HB1034 ENROLLED

26.212.18 4 1034
each card or device issued for each proportionally registered vehicle. The card must, in
addition to the information required by chapter 32-5, identify the number of the license
or other device issued for the proportionally registered vehicle and must be carried in the
vehicle at all times or, in the case of a combination, in the vehicle supplying the motive
power. For purposes of this section, the operator may provide proof in either paper or
electronic format including a display of an electronic image on an electronic device.
In addition to the registration fees, the department shall charge the owner, when
sent to the owner through the mail:
(1) Twelve dollars per license plate or set of plates; and
(2) Two dollars and fifty cents per decal or set of decals.
If the applicant requests that the plate or decal be express mailed, the applicant
must pay any costs for the express mailing service.
HB1034 ENROLLED

26.212.18 5 1034
An Act to increase fees for decals and license plates mailed to vehicle owners.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1034
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1034 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1034 ENROLLED